Maryland, session 2025, HB0742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0742*

HOUSE BILL 742
7–207.
(b) (2) (I) Unless a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, and the Commission has found that the
capacity is necessary to ensure a sufficient supply of electricity to customers in the State, a
person may not exercise a right of condemnation in connection with the construction of a
generating station.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A PERSON MAY NOT EXERCISE A RIGHT OF CONDEMNATION IN
CONNECTION WITH THE CONSTRUCTION OF A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION
UNDER THIS SECTION.
7–207.1.
(c) (1) The Commission shall require a person that is exempted from the
requirement to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity to obtain approval
from the Commission under this section before the person may construct a generating
station described in subsection (b) of this section.
(H) A PERSON MAY NOT EXERCISE A RIGHT OF CONDEMNATION IN
CONNECTION WITH THE CONSTRUCTION OF A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION
UNDER THIS SECTION.
7–207.2.
(b) This section applies to a person who constructs a generating station that:
(1) has the capacity to produce more than 2 megawatts of electricity, as
measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter, from a solar
photovoltaic system; and
(2) is exempted under § 7–207(b)(1)(ii) of this subtitle from the requirement
to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity.
(E) A PERSON MAY NOT EXERCISE A RIGHT OF CONDEMNATION IN
CONNECTION WITH THE CONSTRUCTION OF A SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM
UNDER THIS SECTION.
7–208.
(b) This section applies to any person:
(1) constructing a generating station and its associated overhead
transmission lines designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts;

HOUSE BILL 742 3
(2) exercising the right of condemnation in connection with the
construction; or
(3) constructing a qualified submerged renewable energy line.
(K) A PERSON MAY NOT EXERCISE A RIGHT OF CONDEMNATION IN
CONNECTION WITH THE CONSTRUCTION OF A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION
UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.